Hawaii statutes.
[§425E-502] Liability for
contribution. (a) A partner's obligation to contribute money or
other property or other benefit to, or to perform services for, a limited
partnership shall not be excused by the partner's death, disability, or other
inability to perform personally.

(b) If a partner does not make a promised
nonmonetary contribution, the partner is obligated at the option of the limited
partnership to contribute money equal to that portion of the value, as stated
in the required information, of the stated contribution which has not been
made.

(c) The obligation of a partner to make a
contribution or return money or other property paid or distributed in violation
of this chapter may be compromised only by consent of all partners. A creditor
of a limited partnership that extends credit or otherwise acts in reliance on
an obligation described in subsection (a), without notice of any compromise
under this subsection, may enforce the original obligation. [L 2003, c 210, pt
of §1]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next